Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.700

Tourist promotion.

Any city or town in this state acting through its council or other legislative body shall have power to expend moneys and conduct promotion of resources and facilities in the city or town, or general area, by advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for the purpose of attracting visitors and encouraging tourist expansion.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 61 s 2.]